Utah statutes.
77-38-13.   Declaration of legislative authority.

It is the view of the Legislature that the provisions of this chapter, and other provisions enacted simultaneously with it, are substantive provisions within inherent legislative authority.  In the event that any of the provisions of this chapter, and other provisions enacted simultaneously with it, are interpreted to be procedural in nature, the Legislature also intends to invoke its powers to modify procedural rules under the Utah Constitution.



Enacted by Chapter 198, 1994 General Session

